Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-912
Subject, defined.

(1) Subject means any person concerning whom a certificate or petition has been filed under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act. Subject does not include any person under eighteen years of age unless such person is an emancipated minor.

(2) Subject also includes a person who is a member of a tribe or eligible for membership in a tribe, who is domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska, and concerning whom mental health involuntary commitment or emergency protective custody proceedings have been initiated under tribal law.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 94;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1014;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 32;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 11.